Hawaii statutes.
§324-13 Legal proceedings; information
excluded from. Any findings, conclusions, or summaries resulting from
medical studies within the scope of this part shall not be used or made
available in any legal proceeding. Any information provided to any research or
study committee shall not be used or made available in any legal proceeding
unless it is unobtainable from the original source. In such event, the
judicial officer shall in chambers inspect the committee's findings,
conclusions, or summaries and make available factual information contained
therein. [L 1964, c 13, §4; Supp, §48B-13; HRS §324-13]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next